Nebraska, session 109, LB543.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB543 LB543
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 60-392, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
60-392 (1) Except as provided otherwise in this section,
registration may be renewed annually in a manner designated by the
department and upon payment of the same fee as provided for the original
registration. On making an application for renewal, the registration
certificate for the preceding registration period or renewal notice or
other evidence designated by the department shall be presented with the
application. A person may renew an annual registration up to thirty days
prior to the date of expiration.
(2) The certificate of registration and license plates issued by the
department shall be valid during the registration period for which they
are issued, and when validation decals issued pursuant to section
60-3,101 have been affixed to the license plates, the plates shall also
be valid for the registration period designated by such validation
decals. If a person renews an annual registration up to thirty days prior
to the date of expiration, the registration shall be valid for such time
period as well.
(3) The registration period for motor vehicles and trailers required
to be registered as provided in section 60-362 shall expire on the first
day of the month one year from the month of issuance, and renewal shall
become due on such day and shall become delinquent on the first day of
the following month.
(4) Subsections (1) through (3) of this section do not apply to
dealer's license plates, repossession plates, and transporter plates as
provided in sections 60-373, 60-375, 60-378, and 60-379, which plates
shall be issued for a calendar year.
(5)(a) This subsection applies beginning on an implementation date
designated by the director on or before January 1, 2029.
(b) For any registration issued pursuant to subsections (1) through
(4) of this section, a person may opt to register for an annual period or
-2-

LB543 LB543
2025 2025
for a multiyear period of two or three years.
(c) At the time of registration renewal for a multiyear period, fees
and taxes shall be paid for each year of the multiyear renewal including
the fees provided for in sections 60-3,141 and 60-3,156.
(6) (5) The registration period for apportioned vehicles as provided
in section 60-3,198 shall be renewed monthly, quarterly, or annually at
the discretion of the director. Such registration period expires on the
last day of the registration period and renewal is delinquent on the
first day of the second full month following such expiration date. The
department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to establish a
staggered registration system for apportioned vehicles registered
pursuant to section 60-3,198, including the collection of eighteen or
fewer months of registration fees.
Sec. 2. Section 60-3,100, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
60-3,100 (1) The department shall issue to every person whose motor
vehicle or trailer is registered one or two fully reflectorized license
plates upon which shall be displayed (a) the registration number
consisting of letters and numerals assigned to such motor vehicle or
trailer in figures not less than two and one-half inches nor more than
three inches in height and (b) also the word Nebraska suitably lettered
so as to be attractive. The license plates shall be of a color designated
by the director. The color of the plates shall be changed each time the
license plates are changed. Each time the license plates are changed, the
director shall secure competitive bids for materials pursuant to the
State Procurement Act. Autocycle, motorcycle, minitruck, low-speed
vehicle, and trailer license plate letters and numerals may be one-half
the size of those required in this section.
(2)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, two license
plates shall be issued for every motor vehicle.
(b) One license plate shall be issued for (i) apportionable
-3-

LB543 LB543
2025 2025
vehicles, (ii) buses, (iii) dealers, (iv) minitrucks, (v) motorcycles,
other than autocycles, (vi) special interest motor vehicles that use the
special interest motor vehicle license plate authorized by and issued
under section 60-3,135.01, (vii) trailers, and (viii) truck-tractors.
(c)(i) One license plate shall be issued, upon request and
compliance with this subdivision, for any passenger car which is not
manufactured to be equipped with a bracket on the front of the vehicle to
display a license plate. A license decal shall be issued with the license
plate as provided in subdivision (ii) of this subdivision and shall be
displayed on the driver's side of the windshield. In order to request a
single license plate and license decal, there shall be an additional
annual nonrefundable registration fee of fifty dollars plus the cost of
the decal paid to the county treasurer at the time of registration. All
fees collected under this subdivision shall be remitted to the State
Treasurer for credit to the Highway Trust Fund.
(ii) The department shall design, procure, and furnish to the county
treasurers a license decal which shall be displayed as evidence that a
license plate has been obtained under this subdivision. Each county
treasurer shall furnish a license decal to the person obtaining the
plate.
(d) When two license plates are issued, one shall be prominently
displayed at all times on the front and one on the rear of the registered
motor vehicle or trailer. When only one plate is issued, it shall be
prominently displayed on the rear of the registered motor vehicle or
trailer. When only one plate is issued for motor vehicles registered
pursuant to section 60-3,198 and truck-tractors, it shall be prominently
displayed on the front of the apportionable vehicle.
(3)(a) Beginning on an implementation date designated by the
director on or before January 1, 2029, the department may deliver any
license plate or registration certificate to the applicant or to the
county treasurer of the county in which the motor vehicle, trailer, or
-4-

LB543 LB543
2025 2025
semitrailer is registered by United States mail or through an alternative
shipping service. The delivery of such license plate or registration
shall be made through a secure process.
(b) If delivery of any license plate or registration certificate is
made by the department to the applicant, the department may charge a
postage and handling fee in an amount not more than necessary to recover
the cost of postage and handling for the specific items mailed to the
applicant. The department shall remit the fee to the State Treasurer for
credit to the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund.
(4) Any consumer who presents proof of registration shall be
permitted to operate the motor vehicle or tow such trailer for a period
of thirty days without a mailed license plate displayed.
Sec. 3. Section 60-3,101, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
60-3,101 (1) License plates shall be issued every six years
beginning with the license plates issued in the year 2005.
(2) In the years in which license plates are not issued, in lieu of
issuing such license plates, the department shall furnish to every person
whose motor vehicle or trailer is registered one or two validation
decals, as the case may be. Such validation decals shall bear the year
for which issued and be so constructed as to permit them to be
permanently affixed to the license plates.
(3) This section shall not apply to license plates issued pursuant
to sections 60-3,203 and 60-3,228.
Sec. 4. Section 60-3,102, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
60-3,102 (1) Whenever new license plates, including duplicate or
replacement license plates, are issued to any person, a fee per plate
shall be charged in addition to all other required fees. The license
plate fee shall be determined by the department and shall only cover the
cost of the license plate and validation decals but shall not exceed
-5-

LB543 LB543
2025 2025
four :(a) Three dollars and fifty cents through December 31, 2022; and(b)
Four dollars and twenty-five cents. beginning January 1, 2023.
(2) All fees collected pursuant to this section shall be remitted to
the State Treasurer for credit to the Highway Trust Fund. Beginning with
the 2029 license plate issuance cycle, all fees collected pursuant to
this section shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the
License Plate Cash Fund.
(3) This section shall not apply to license plates issued pursuant
to section 60-3,122, 60-3,122.02, 60-3,123, 60-3,124, or 60-3,125.
Sec. 5. Section 60-3,157, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-3,157 If a license plate, or registration certificate, or weight
or validation decal is lost or mutilated or has become illegible, the
person to whom such license plate, and registration certificate, or decal
has been issued shall immediately apply to the county treasurer for a
duplicate registration certificate and decals or for new license plates,
accompanying his or her application with a fee of one dollar for a
duplicate registration certificate and decals and a fee of two dollars
and fifty cents for a duplicate or replacement license plate. No fee
shall be required under this section if the vehicle or trailer was
reported stolen under section 60-178.
Sec. 6. Original section 60-3,157, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and sections 60-392, 60-3,100, 60-3,101, and 60-3,102, Revised
Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-6-